incubator/apertium-cy-kw.kw.dix
    <pardef n="pob/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>low</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="y/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="g/werthjy__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ewrthjyow</l>
          <r>werthjy<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>werthjy</l>
          <r>werthjy<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/og__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogh</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mog</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="men/eth__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eth</l>
          <r>eth<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ythyow</l>
          <r>eth<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tok/yn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nys</l>
          <r>yn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yn</l>
          <r>yn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="er/ow__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ewi</l>
          <r>ow<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>ow<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Kembr/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yon</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bledh/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynnow</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="en/ys__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esow</l>
          <r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="led/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>row</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bugh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="marg/has__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asow</l>
          <r>has<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>has</l>
          <r>has<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="luf__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dyw</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ober__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fent/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynyow</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/ans__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ans</l>
          <r>ans<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yns</l>
          <r>ans<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dew/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osow</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="estriger__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oryon</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mane/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gow</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="darra/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jow</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pody/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gow</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/argh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>argh</l>
          <r>argh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ergh</l>
          <r>argh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cad/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eryow</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ensomp/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lys</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/am__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ymmyn</l>
          <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwr/ek__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ageth</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="cadar"><i>cad</i><par n="cad/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><par n="initial-t"/><i>u</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podyk"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ody</i><par n="pody/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="padellyk"><par n="initial-p"/><i>adelly</i><par n="pody/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mes"><par n="initial-m"/><i>es</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dewas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ew</i><par n="dew/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hogh"><i>h</i><par n="h/og__n"/></e>
    <e lm="myldyr"><par n="initial-m"/><i>yldyr</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fardel"><i>fardel</i><par n="ober__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tam"><par n="initial-t"/><i></i><par n="t/am__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kenethel"><par n="initial-k"/><i>eneth</i><par n="pob/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paper"><par n="initial-p"/><i>aper</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="erow"><i>er</i><par n="er/ow__n"/></e>
    <e lm="son"><i>son</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tylu"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ylu</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ensompel"><i>ensomp</i><par n="ensomp/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lyther"><i>lyther</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leder"><i>led</i><par n="led/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crow"><i>crow</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyr"><par n="initial-t"/><i>yr</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwerthjy"><par n="initial-g"/><i></i><par n="g/werthjy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luf"><i>luf</i><par n="luf__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyller"><par n="initial-t"/><i>yller</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pow"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ow</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yar"><i>y</i><par n="y/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manek"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ane</i><par n="mane/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styr"><i>styr</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coger"><i>coger</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fenten"><i>fent</i><par n="fent/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sethyk"><i>sethy</i><par n="pody/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="darras"><par n="initial-d"/><i>arra</i><par n="darra/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="estriger"><i>estriger</i><par n="estriger__n"/></e>
    <e lm="degol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>egol</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ober"><i>ober</i><par n="ober__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gorher"><par n="initial-g"/><i>orher</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elyn"><i>elyn</i><par n="ober__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cath"><i>cath</i><par n="bugh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="termyn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ermyn</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crys"><i>crys</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marghas"><par n="initial-m"/><i>arg</i><par n="marg/has__n"/></e>
    <e lm="margh"><par n="initial-m"/><i></i><par n="m/argh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lyw"><i>lyw</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enys"><i>en</i><par n="en/ys__n"/></e>
